Arkansas, session 2025, HB1068.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-4-101(28), concerning the definition of
"nonstate employees" under the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System,
is amended to read as follows:
(28) “Nonstate employees” means county employees, municipal
employees, rural waterworks facilities board employees, regional airport
authority employees, border municipal airport employees, metropolitan port
authority employees, public facilities board employees, regional solid waste
management board employees, joint county and municipal sanitation authority
employees, regional water distribution board employees, the employees of
economic development districts recognized as planning and development
districts under § 14-166-202, school employees, public water authority
employees, and the employees of the Intergovernmental Juvenile Detention
Council;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 24-4-101(30)(A), concerning the definition
of "participating public employer" under the Arkansas Public Employees'
*LJH027*
03-05-2025 10:26:18 LJH027

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 HB1068
Retirement System, is amended to read as follows:
(A) Any county, municipality, rural waterworks facilities
board, regional airport authority, border municipal airport authority,
metropolitan port authority, public facilities board, regional solid waste
management board, joint county and municipal sanitation authority, suburban
improvement district under § 14-92-502, public water authority, or regional
water distribution board in the state whose employees are included in the
membership of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 24-4-101 is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(48) "Metropolitan port authority" means a metropolitan port
authority created under the Metropolitan Port Authority Act of 1961, § 14-
185-101 et seq.

/s/M. McElroy




















03-05-2025 10:26:18 LJH027